Wisconsin, session 2025, SB718.
do enact as follows:SB718,13Section 1. 27.01 (7) (c) 13. of the statutes is created to read:SB718,2,3427.01 (7) (c) 13. Any vehicle, except a motor bus, occupied by a person who 1produces evidence that he or she is a veteran, as defined in 38 USC 101, or that he 2or she meets any of the eligibility criteria specified in 10 USC 1126 (a) (1) to (3) for 3a gold star lapel button.SB718,2,44